District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Parity in Workers’ Compensation Recovery Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 4(a-1) of the District of Columbia Workers’ Compensation Act of 1979,
effective July 1, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-77; D.C. Official Code § 32-1503(a-1)), is amended to read
as follows:
“(a-1)(1) Notwithstanding any other law, the payment or award of compensation under
the workers’ compensation law of any other state to an employee or his dependent shall not bar a
claim for compensation under this act for the same injury or death; provided, that any such award
of compensation under this act shall be reduced by the amount of compensation received or
awarded under the workers’ compensation law of any other state.
“(2) This subsection shall apply to all claims under this act that are pending as of
the effective date of the Parity in Workers’ Compensation Recovery Emergency Amendment Act
of 2022, effective June 28, 2022 (D.C. Act 24-453; 69 DCR 7765) (“emergency act”), and all
claims under this act filed after the effective date of the emergency act.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2